Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1004
Extension of water supply to cemetery.

Any municipality, maintaining and operating a cemetery beyond its corporate limits, may extend its water supply or water distribution system to such cemetery.

Laws 1957, c. 19, § 2, p. 151.